Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20183-135
Air navigation facility; certificate of approval; hearing; standards to be considered.

In determining whether to issue a certificate of approval or license for the use or operation of any proposed airport or restricted landing area, the division shall take into consideration (1) its proposed location, size, and layout, (2) the relationship of the proposed airport or restricted landing area to a comprehensive plan for statewide and nationwide development, (3) whether there are safe areas available for expansion purposes, (4) whether the adjoining area is free from obstructions based on a proper glide ratio, (5) the nature of the terrain, (6) the nature of the uses to which the proposed airport or restricted landing area will be put, and (7) the possibilities for future development.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 9(8), p. 94;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 30.